Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.310

Date of election—Number.

On the Tuesday after the first Monday of November in the year in which a president of the United States is to be elected, there shall be elected as many electors of president and vice president of the United States as there are senators and representatives in Congress allotted to this state.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1424; 1965 c 9 s 29.71.010. Prior: 1891 c 148 s 1; RRS s 5138. Formerly RCW 29.71.010.]